District of Columbia statutes.
38-111

Investigation or trial of teacher.

When a teacher is on trial or being investigated he or she shall have the right to be attended by counsel and by at least 1 friend of his or her selection.

History

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 321, ch. 3446, § 10

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-115.
1973 Ed., § 31-116.